Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1417
Additional genetic testing; when.

If the result of genetic testing or the expert's analysis of inherited characteristics is disputed, the court, upon reasonable request of a party, shall order that additional testing be done by the same laboratory or an independent laboratory at the expense of the party requesting additional testing.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 4.